Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 126C.13, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. General education aid. deleted text begin For fiscal year 2015 and later,deleted text end A district's general education aid equals: (1) general education revenue, excluding operating capital revenue, equity revenue, local optional revenue, and transition revenue; plus (2) operating capital aid under section 126C.10, subdivision 13b; plus (3) equity aid under section 126C.10, subdivision 30; plus (4) transition aid under section 126C.10, subdivision 33; plus (5) shared time aid under section 126C.01, subdivision 7; plus (6) referendum aid under section 126C.17, subdivisions 7 deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end 7anew text begin , and 7cnew text end ; plus (7) online learning aid under section 124D.096; plus (8) local optional aid according to section 126C.10, subdivision 2e, paragraph (f). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.17, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7c. new text end new text begin Seasonal tax base replacement aid. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "eligible school district" means a school district for which the seasonal tax base adjustment factor under paragraph (c) is at least equal to 0.15. A school district determined eligible under this paragraph for aid in fiscal year 2027 or any later fiscal year remains an eligible school district for aid in any subsequent fiscal year. new text end new text begin (b) A district's seasonal tax base replacement aid equals the product of (1) the seasonal tax base adjustment factor, and (2) the district's referendum equalization levy calculated under subdivision 6, after any adjustment under subdivisions 7a and 7b. new text end new text begin (c) A district's seasonal tax base adjustment factor equals the lesser of 0.50 or the ratio of (1) the seasonal market value for the district, to (2) the sum of the referendum market value and the seasonal market value for the district. For purposes of this paragraph, "seasonal market value" means the market value of all taxable property classified as class 4c(12) under section 273.13. new text end new text begin (d) The amount calculated under paragraph (b) must be used to reduce the district's referendum levy determined after any adjustment under subdivisions 7a and 7b. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxes payable in 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SEASONAL TAX BASE REPLACEMENT AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Additional general education aid. new text end new text begin (a) For additional general education aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.13: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,422,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The 2027 appropriation includes $0 for 2026 and $3,422,000 for 2027. new text end